New Jersey, session 222, S1043.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1972, c.197 (C.39:6B-1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.         Every owner or registered owner of a motor vehicle registered or principally garaged in this State shall maintain motor vehicle liability insurance coverage, under provisions approved by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, insuring against loss resulting from liability imposed by law for bodily injury, death and property damage sustained by any person arising out of the ownership, maintenance, operation or use of a motor vehicle wherein such coverage shall be at least in: (1) an amount or limit of $15,000 for plans issued or renewed prior to January 1, 2023, $25,000 for plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2023 but prior to January 1, 2026, and $35,000 for plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, exclusive of interest and costs, on account of injury to, or death of, one person, in any one accident; and (2) an amount or limit, subject to such limit for any one person so injured or killed, of $30,000 for plans issued or renewed prior to January 1, 2023, $50,000 for plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2023 but prior to January 1, 2026, and $70,000 for plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, exclusive of interest and costs, on account of injury to or death of, more than one person, in any one accident; and (3) an amount or limit of $25,000 for plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2023, exclusive of interest and costs, for damage to property in any one accident; and (4) for a commercial motor vehicle, an amount or limit of $1,500,000, exclusive of interest and costs, on account of injury to or death of, one or more persons in any one accident or for damage to property in any one accident; and (5) for a commercial motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of 10,001 or more pounds but less than 26,001 pounds, or farm tractors and traction equipment used for farm operation registered pursuant to R.S.39:3-24, an amount or limit of $300,000, exclusive of interest and costs, on account of injury to or death of, one or more persons in any one accident or for damage to property in any one accident.  The provisions of paragraphs (4) and (5) of this subsection may be satisfied by a commercial automobile insurance policy, fleet insurance policy, commercial umbrella insurance policy, commercial excess insurance policy, similar insurance policy, or any combination thereof. b.    Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection a. of this section, an owner or registered owner of an automobile, as defined in section 2 of P.L.1972, c.70 (C.39:6A-2), registered or primarily garaged in the State may satisfy the requirements of subsection a. of this section by maintaining a basic automobile insurance policy containing coverages provided pursuant to subsections a. and b. of section 4 of P.L.1998, c.21 (C.39:6A-3.1). c.     Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection a. of this section, an owner or registered owner of an automobile, as defined in section 2 of P.L.1972, c.70 (C.39:6A-2), registered or primarily garaged in the State may satisfy the requirements of subsection a. of this section by maintaining a special automobile insurance policy containing coverages provided pursuant to subsection b. of section 45 of P.L.2003, c.89 (C.39:6A-3.3). d.    Upon the renewal of a policy of insurance that, under its original policy limits, would no longer meet the minimum requirements established pursuant to this section, an insurer shall notify the named insured that the policy limits have been increased to meet the requirements established pursuant to this section.  Notice provided pursuant to this subsection shall specify the limit or limits that have been increased to meet the requirements established pursuant to this section. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, an insurer shall not be required to receive a signed coverage selection form pursuant to N.J.A.C.11:3-15.7, to increase a policy's limits pursuant to this section. e.     As used in this section, "commercial motor vehicle" means a commercial motor vehicle as defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1990, c.103 (C.39:3-10.11) and an autocab as defined pursuant to R.S.48:16-1, and shall include commercially registered vehicles.  For purposes of paragraph (4) of subsection a. of this section, commercial motor vehicle shall not include farm tractors and traction equipment used for farm operation registered pursuant to R.S.39:3-24. For purposes of paragraph (5) of subsection a. of this section, "commercial motor vehicle" shall [also] include commercially registered vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating of 10,001 or more pounds but less than 26,001 pounds, and farm tractors and traction equipment used for farm operation registered pursuant to R.S.39:3-24. (cf: P.L.2023, c.276, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.